Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.290

Impounding cattle and horses—No certificate or proof of ownership when offered for sale—Disposition.

All cattle and horses that are not accompanied by a certificate of permit, inspection certificate, self-inspection certificate meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.160, or other satisfactory proof of ownership when offered for sale and presented for inspection by the director, shall be impounded. If theft is suspected, the director shall immediately initiate an investigation. If theft is not suspected, the animal shall be sold and the proceeds retained by the director. Upon the sale of the cattle or horses, the director shall give the purchasers an inspection certificate for the cattle or horses documenting their ownership.

[ 2010 c 66 s 12; 2003 c 326 s 35; 1995 c 374 s 53; 1989 c 286 s 23; 1981 c 296 s 20; 1979 c 154 s 18; 1967 ex.s. c 120 s 6; 1959 c 54 s 29.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.

Severability—1979 c 154: See note following RCW 15.49.330.